en: Gingerbread blocks
fr: Blocs de pain d'épices

en: Plain gingerbreads covered with chocolate
de: Natur Lebkuchen mit Schokolade überzogen
fr: Pains d'épices natures couverts de chocolat

en: Filled gingerbreads covered with chocolate
de: Gefüllte Lebkuchen mit Schokolade überzogen
fr: Pains d'épices fourrés et couverts de chocolat

en: Savoy-style sponge cake, Savoy cake, Savoy sponge cake
fr: Biscuit de Savoie

en: Brookies
fr: Brookies

en: Krumiri
xx: Krumiri
fr: Krumiri
hr: Krumiri
it: Krumiri

en: Torcetti
xx: Torcetti
fr: Torcetti
it: Torcetti

en: Baci di Dama
it: Baci di Dama

en: Canestrelli
xx: Canestrelli
fr: Canestrelli
it: Canestrelli

en: Canistrelli
xx: Kanistreli
fr: Canistrelli
it: Canistrelli

en: Cantucci, cantuccini
xx: Cantucci
bg: Кантучи, кантучини
fr: Cantucci, cantuccini
it: Cantucci, cantuccini
nl: Cantucci

en: Amaretti
xx: Amaretti
de: Amaretti
es: Amaretti
fr: Amaretti
hr: Amaretti
it: Amaretti, amaretto
nl: Bitterkoekjes
zh: 意大利杏仁小饼

en: Ricciarelli
xx: Ricciarelli
de: Ricciarelli
es: Ricciarelli
fr: Ricciarelli
hr: Ricciarelli
it: Ricciarelli

en: Speculoos, Speculoos biscuit
xx: speculoos
fr: Spéculoos, spéculos
it: Speculoos, Biscotti speziati con cannella

en: Speculaas
ar: سبيكولوس
br: Spekulaas
cs: Spekulatius
de: Spekulatius
eo: Spekulaco
es: spekulatius
fa: اسپکولاس
fi: Speculaas
gd: Spekulatius
hr: Speculaas
ja: スペキュラース
ko: 스페퀼로스
nb: Spekulatius
nl: speculaas
nn: Spekulasje
pl: Speculaas
pt: spekulaas
sv: Spekulatius
zh: 斯派庫魯斯

fr: Nicolettes
nl: Kruidnoten, Speculaasnoten, Pepernoten

en: Breaded products
bg: Панирани продукти
ca: Productes arrebossats
de: Panierte Produkte
es: Empanados
fi: leivitetyt tuotteet
fr: Produits panés, Produit pané
hr: Pohani proizvodi
hu: Rántott termékek
it: Prodotti impanati
lt: Duonos gaminiai
nl: Gepaneerde producten
ru: Хлебные продукты
sv: Panerade produkter
zh: 裹面包糠产品

en: Breaded cheeses
de: Panierter Käse
fr: Fromages panés
hr: Pohani sirevi
nl: Gepaneerde kazen, Gepaneerde kaas
pl: Ser panierowany

en: Frozen breaded cheeses
fr: Fromages panés surgelés
nl: Kaassouflés

en: Breaded camemberts
fr: Camemberts panés